en: Cleansing waters, Cleanser waters
ar: مياه التنظيف
az: Təmizləyici sular
bg: Почистващи води
cs: Čisticí vody
da: Rensevand
de: Reinigungswasser
el: Καθαριστικά νερά
es: Aguas limpiadoras
et: Puhastusveed
fa: آب پاک کننده
fi: Puhdistusvedet
fr: Eaux démaquillantes
ga: Uiscí glanta
hr: Vode za čišćenje
hu: Tisztító vizek
hy: Մաքրող ջրեր
id: Air pembersih
is: Hreinsivatn
it: Acque detergenti
ja: クレンジングウォーター
ka: გამწმენდი წყლები
kk: Тазалау сулары
ko: 클렌징 워터
ky: Тазалоочу суулар
lt: Valomieji vandenys
lv: Attīrošie ūdeņi
mk: Води за чистење
ms: Air pembersih
mt: Ilma tat-tindif
nl: Reinigingswaters
no: Rensevann
pl: Wody oczyszczające
pt: Águas de limpeza
ro: Ape de curățare
ru: Очищающие воды
sk: Čistiace vody
sl: Čistilne vode
sq: Ujëra pastrues
sr: Vode za čišćenje
sv: Rengöringsvatten
sw: Maji ya kusafisha
tg: Оби тозакунанда
th: น้ำยาทำความสะอาด
tk: Arassalaýjy suwlar
tr: Temizleme suları
uk: Очищаючі води
uz: Tozalovchi suvlar
vi: Nước làm sạch
zh: 清洁水

en: Micellar water, Micellar waters
ar: ماء ميسيلار
az: Miselyar su
bg: Мицеларна вода
cs: Micelární voda
da: Micellært vand
de: Mizellenwasser
el: Μικκυλιακό νερό
es: Agua micelar
et: Mitsellaarvesi
fa: میسلار واتر
fi: Misellivesi
fr: Eaux micellaires, eau micellaire, lotions micellaires, lotion micellaire
ga: Uisce micellar
hr: Micelarna voda
hu: Micellás víz
hy: Միցելային ջուր
id: Air micellar
is: Míselvatn
it: Acqua micellare
ja: ミセルウォーター
ka: მიცელარული წყალი
kk: Мицеллярлы су
ko: 미셀 워터
ky: Мицеллярдык суу
lt: Micelinis vanduo
lv: Micelārais ūdens
mk: Мицеларна вода
ms: Air misel
mt: Ilma micellari
nl: Reinigingswater
no: Micellært vann
pl: Woda micelarna
pt: Água micelar
ro: Apă micelară
ru: Мицеллярная вода
sk: Micelárna voda
sl: Micelarna voda
sq: Ujë micelar
sr: Micelarna voda
sv: Micellärt vatten
sw: Maji ya misela
tg: Оби митселярӣ
th: ไมเซลลาร์ วอเตอร์
tk: Misellyar suw
tr: Miselar su
uk: Міцелярна вода
uz: Mitsellyar suv
vi: Nước tẩy trang micellar
zh: 胶束水

en: Cleansing milks, Cleansing milk
ar: حليب منظف
az: Təmizləyici südlər
bg: Почистващо мляко
bn: পরিষ্কারক দুধ
ca: Llets netejadores
cs: Čisticí mléka
da: Rensemælk
de: Reinigungsmilch
el: Γαλάκτωμα καθαρισμού
es: Leches limpiadoras
et: Puhastuspiimad
fa: شیر پاک کننده
fi: Puhdistusmaidot
fr: Laits démaquillants, laits démaquillant
ga: Bainne glantacháin
he: חלב ניקוי
hr: Mlijeko za čišćenje
hu: Arctej
hy: Մաքրող կաթ
id: Susu pembersih
is: Hreinsimjólk
it: Latti detergenti
ja: クレンジングミルク
ka: გამწმენდი რძე
kk: Тазартқыш сүт
km: ទឹកដោះគោសំអាត
ko: 클렌징 밀크
ky: Тазалоочу сүт
lt: Valomasis pienelis
lv: Attīrošs piens
mk: Млеко за чистење
ms: Susu pembersih
mt: Ħalib tat-tindif
nl: Reinigingsmelk
no: Rensemelk
pl: Mleczka oczyszczające
pt: Leites de limpeza
ro: Lapte demachiant
ru: Очищающее молочко
sk: Čistiace mlieka
sl: Mleko za čiščenje
sq: Qumësht pastrues
sr: Млеко за чишћење
sv: Rengöringsmjölk
sw: Maziwa ya kusafisha
tg: Шири тозакунанда
th: น้ำนมทำความสะอาดผิวหน้า
tk: Arassalaýjy süýt
tr: Temizleme sütleri
uk: Молочко для зняття макіяжу
ur: صاف کرنے والا دودھ
uz: Tozalovchi sut
zh: 洁面乳

en: Nail polish removers, Nail polish remover, Nail varnish remover
ar: مزيل طلاء الأظافر
az: Dırnaq lakını təmizləyən vasitə
bg: Лакочистител
bn: নেইল পলিশ রিমুভার
ca: Removedor d'esmalt d'ungles
cs: Odličovač laku na nehty, Odlakovače
da: Neglelakfjernere, Neglelakfjerner
de: Nagellackentferner
el: Αφαιρετικό βερνικιού νυχιών
es: Quitaesmaltes, Quitaesmalte
et: Küünelakieemaldaja
fa: پاک کننده لاک ناخن
fi: Kynsilakanpoistoaine
fr: Dissolvants pour vernis à ongles, Dissolvants
ga: Bainisteoir snas ingne
he: מסיר לק
hr: Odstranjivač laka za nokte
hu: Körömlakklemosó
hy: Եղունգների լաքը հեռացնող միջոց
id: Penghapus cat kuku
is: Naglalakkahreinsir
it: Solventi unghie, Levasmalto
ja: 除光液
ka: ფრჩხილის ლაქის მოსაშორებელი
kk: Тырнақ бояуын кетіргіш
km: ឧបករណ៍​លុប​ពណ៌ក្រចក
ko: 매니큐어 리무버
ky: Тырмак боёгун кетиргич
lt: Nagų lako valiklis
lv: Nagu lakas noņēmējs
mk: Отстранувач на лак за нокти
ms: Penanggal pengilat kuku
mt: Remover tal-lustrar tad-dwiefer
nb: Neglelakkfjerner
nl: Nagellakremovers, Nagellakremover
pl: Zmywacze do paznokci, Zmywacz do paznokci
pt: Removedores de esmalte, Removedor de verniz
ro: Dizolvant de unghii
ru: Средства для снятия лака, Жидкость для снятия лака
sk: Odličovač laku na nechty
sl: Odstranjevalec laka za nohte
sq: Heqës i llakut të thonjve
sr: Скидач лака за нокте
sv: Nagellacksborttagare, Nagellacksremover
sw: Kiondoa rangi ya kucha
tg: Тозакунандаи лаки нохун
th: น้ำยาล้างเล็บ
tk: Dyrnak lakyny aýyryjy
tr: Oje Çıkarıcılar, Aseton
uk: Засіб для зняття лаку
ur: ناخن پالش ہٹانے والا
uz: Tirnoq lakini tozalash vositasi
vi: Nước tẩy sơn móng tay
zh: 洗甲水

en: Eye makeup remover
ar: مزيل مكياج العيون
az: Göz makiyajı təmizləyicisi
bg: Препарат за премахване на грим от очите
bn: চোখের মেকআপ রিমুভার
ca: Desmaquillant d'ulls
cs: Odličovač očí
da: Øjenmakeupfjerner
de: Augen Make-up Entferner
el: Ντεμακιγιάζ ματιών
es: Desmaquillante de ojos
et: Silmameigi eemaldaja
fa: پاک کننده آرایش چشم
fi: Silmämeikinpoistoaine
fr: Démaquillants yeux, Démaquillant yeux
ga: Bainisteoir smididh súl
he: מסיר איפור עיניים
hr: Sredstvo za uklanjanje šminke s očiju
hu: Szemfestéklemosó
hy: Աչքերի դիմահարդարման հեռացնող միջոց
id: Pembersih riasan mata
is: Augnfarðahreinsir
it: Struccante occhi
ja: アイメイク落とし
ka: თვალის მაკიაჟის მოსაშორებელი საშუალება
kk: Көз макияжын тазалағыш
km: ឧបករណ៍ដកគ្រឿងសម្អាងភ្នែក
ko: 아이 메이크업 리무버
ky: Көз макияжын тазалоочу каражат
lt: Akių makiažo valiklis
lv: Acu kosmētikas noņēmējs
mk: Отстранувач на шминка за очи
ms: Penanggal solek mata
mt: Remover tal-make-up tal-għajnejn
nl: Oogmake-up remover
no: Øyesminkefjerner
pl: Zmywacz do makijażu oczu
pt: Removedor de maquiagem para os olhos
ro: Demachiant pentru ochi
ru: Средство для снятия макияжа с глаз
sk: Odličovač očí
sl: Odstranjevalec ličil za oči
sq: Pastrues grimi për sy
sr: Средство за уклањање шминке са очију
sv: Ögonmakeupborttagning
sw: Kiondoa vipodozi vya macho
tg: Тозакунандаи ороиши чашм
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์ล้างเครื่องสำอางรอบดวงตา
tk: Göz makýažyny aýyryjy
tr: Göz makyajı temizleyicisi
uk: Засіб для зняття макіяжу з очей
ur: آنکھوں کا میک اپ ہٹانے والا
uz: Ko'z makiyajini tozalash vositasi
vi: Nước tẩy trang mắt
zh: 眼部卸妆液

en: Nose strips
ar: لصقات الأنف
az: Burun zolaqları
bg: Ленти за нос
cs: Nosní pásky
da: Næsestrips
de: Nasenstrips
el: Ρινικές ταινίες
es: Tiras para la nariz
et: Nina ribad
fa: چسب بینی
fi: Nenäliuskat
fr: Patchs pour le nez
ga: Stiallacha srón
hr: Flasteri za nos
hu: Orrtapasz
hy: Քթի շերտեր
id: Plester hidung
is: Nefrennur
it: Cerotti per il naso
ja: 鼻用ストリップ
ka: ცხვირის ზოლები
kk: Мұрын жолақтары
ko: 코팩
ky: Мурун тилкелери
lt: Nosies juostelės
lv: Deguna plāksteri
mk: Ленти за нос
ms: Pelekat hidung
mt: Strixxi għall-imnieħer
nl: Neusstrips
no: Nesestrips
pl: Płatki na nos
pt: Adesivos nasais
ro: Benzi pentru nas
ru: Полоски для носа
sk: Nosné pásiky
sl: Obliži za nos
sq: Shirita për hundë
sr: Траке за нос
sv: Näsremsor
sw: Vipande vya pua
tg: Рахҳои бинӣ
th: แผ่นแปะจมูก
tk: Burun zolaklary
tr: Burun bantları
uk: Смужки для носа
uz: Burun yamoqlari
vi: Miếng dán mũi
zh: 鼻贴

en: Face lotions
de: Gesichtslotionen, Gesichtswasser
es: Lociones faciales, Loción facial
fr: Lotions visage, Lotion visage
it: Lozioni viso, Lozione viso
nl: Gezichtslotions, Gezichtslotion
pt: Loções faciais, Loção facial

en: Hair, Hair products
ar: شعر، منتجات الشعر
az: Saç, saç məhsulları
bg: Коса, продукти за коса
bn: চুল, চুলের পণ্য
ca: Cabell, productes per al cabell
cs: Vlasy, vlasové produkty
da: Hår, hårprodukter
de: Haar, Haarprodukte
el: Μαλλιά, προϊόντα μαλλιών
es: Cabello, productos para el cabello
et: Juuksed, juuksetooted
fa: مو، محصولات مو
fi: Hiukset, hiustuotteet
fr: Cheveux, produits pour cheveux, produits pour les cheveux, produits capillaires, produits coiffants, produits capilaires
ga: Gruaig, táirgí gruaige
he: שיער, מוצרי שיער
hr: Kosa, proizvodi za kosu
hu: Haj, hajtermékek
hy: Մազեր, մազերի արտադրանք
id: Rambut, produk rambut
is: Hár, hárvörur
it: Capelli, prodotti per capelli
ja: 髪、ヘア製品
ka: თმა, თმის პროდუქტები
kk: Шаш, шаш өнімдері
km: សក់, ផលិតផលសក់
ko: 머리카락, 헤어 제품
ky: Чач, чач буюмдары
lt: Plaukai, plaukų produktai
lv: Mati, matu produkti
mk: Коса, производи за коса
ms: Rambut, produk rambut
mt: Xagħar, prodotti tax-xagħar
nl: Haar, haarproducten
no: Hår, hårprodukter
pl: Włosy, produkty do włosów
pt: Cabelo, produtos para o cabelo
ro: Păr, produse de păr
ru: Волосы, продукты для волос
sk: Vlasy, vlasové produkty
sl: Lasje, izdelki za lase
sq: Flokë, produkte flokësh
sr: Коса, производи за косу
sv: Hår, hårprodukter
sw: Nywele, bidhaa za nywele
tg: Мӯй, маҳсулоти мӯй
th: ผม, ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลผม
tk: Saç, saç önümleri
tr: Saç, saç ürünleri
uk: Волосся, засоби для волосся
ur: بال، بالوں کی مصنوعات
uz: Soch, soch mahsulotlari
vi: Tóc, sản phẩm tóc
zh: 头发，头发产品

en: Hair conditioners
ar: مكيفات الشعر
az: Saç kondisionerləri
bg: Балсами за коса
cs: Kondicionéry na vlasy
da: Hårbalsam
de: Haarspülungen, Haarspülung
el: Μαλακτικά μαλλιών
es: Acondicionadores para el cabello
et: Juuksepalsamid
fa: نرم کننده های مو
fi: Hoitoaineet
fr: Après-shampoings, Après-shampoing, Après-shampooings, Après shampooing
ga: Oiriúntóirí gruaige
hr: Regeneratori za kosu
hu: Hajbalzsamok
hy: Մազի կոնդիցիոներներ
id: Kondisioner rambut
is: Hárnæring
it: Balsami per capelli
ja: ヘアコンディショナー
ka: თმის კონდიციონერები
kk: Шашқа арналған кондиционерлер
ko: 헤어 컨디셔너
ky: Чач кондиционерлери
lt: Plaukų kondicionieriai
lv: Matu kondicionieri
mk: Регенератори за коса
ms: Perapi rambut
mt: Kondizzjonaturi tax-xagħar
nl: Conditioners
no: Balsam
pl: Odżywki do włosów
pt: Condicionadores de cabelo
ro: Balsamuri de păr
ru: Кондиционеры для волос
sk: Kondicionéry na vlasy
sl: Balzami za lase
sq: Balsam për flokë
sr: Регенератори за косу
sv: Hårbalsam
sw: Vipodozi vya nywele
tg: Кондитсионерҳои мӯй
th: ครีมนวดผม
tk: Saç kondisionerleri
tr: Saç kremleri
uk: Кондиціонери для волосся
uz: Soch konditsionerlari
vi: Dầu xả
zh: 护发素

en: Anti-dandruff hair conditioners
ar: بلسم ضد القشرة
az: Kəpəyə qarşı saç kremləri
bg: Балсами против пърхот
cs: Kondicionéry proti lupům
da: Balsam mod skæl
de: Anti-Schuppen-Haarspülungen
el: Μαλακτικά μαλλιών κατά της πιτυρίδας
es: Acondicionadores anticaspa
et: Kõõmavastased palsamid
fa: نرم کننده مو ضد شوره
fi: Hilseenestobalsamit
fr: Après-shampoings antipelliculaires, Après-shampoing antipelliculaire
ga: Oiriúntóirí gruaige frith-dandruff
hr: Regeneratori protiv peruti
hu: Korpa elleni hajbalzsamok
hy: Թեփի դեմ մազերի կոնդիցիոներներ
id: Kondisioner anti ketombe
is: Hárnæring gegn flösu
it: Balsami antiforfora
ja: ふけ防止ヘアコンディショナー
ka: ქერტლის საწინააღმდეგო თმის კონდიციონერები
kk: Қауызғаққа қарсы шаш кондиционерлері
ko: 비듬 방지 헤어 컨디셔너
ky: Какачты кетирүүчү чач кондиционерлери
lt: Kondicionieriai nuo pleiskanų
lv: Matu kondicionieri pret blaugznām
mk: Регенератори против првут
ms: Perapi rambut anti kelemumur
mt: Kondizzjonaturi tax-xagħar kontra l-brija
nl: Anti-roos conditioners
no: Balsam mot flass
pl: Odżywki przeciwłupieżowe
pt: Condicionadores anti-caspa
ro: Balsam de păr anti-mătreață
ru: Кондиционеры против перхоти
sk: Kondicionéry proti lupinám
sl: Balzami proti prhljaju
sq: Balsam kundër zbokthit
sr: Регенератори против перути
sv: Hårbalsam mot mjäll
sw: Vipodozi vya nywele vya kuzuia mba
tg: Кондитсионерҳои зидди сабӯсак
th: ครีมนวดผมขจัดรังแค
tk: Kepege garşy saç kremleri
tr: Kepek önleyici saç kremleri
uk: Кондиціонери проти лупи
uz: Qazg'oqqa qarshi soch kremlari
vi: Dầu xả trị gàu
zh: 去屑护发素

en: Hair conditioners for colored hair
ar: بلسم للشعر المصبوغ
az: Rənglənmiş saçlar üçün saç kremləri
bg: Балсами за боядисана коса
cs: Kondicionéry pro barvené vlasy
da: Balsam til farvet hår
de: Haarspülungen für coloriertes Haar
el: Μαλακτικά μαλλιών για βαμμένα μαλλιά
es: Acondicionadores para cabello teñido
et: Värvitud juuste palsamid
fa: نرم کننده مو برای موهای رنگ شده
fi: Hoitoaineet värjätyille hiuksille
fr: Après-shampoings pour cheveux colorés
ga: Oiriúntóirí gruaige do ghruaig daite
hr: Regeneratori za obojenu kosu
hu: Hajbalzsam festett hajra
hy: Մազերի կոնդիցիոներներ ներկված մազերի համար
id: Kondisioner rambut untuk rambut diwarnai
is: Hárnæring fyrir litað hár
it: Balsami per capelli colorati
ja: カラーリングヘア用ヘアコンディショナー
ka: კონდიციონერები შეღებილი თმისთვის
kk: Боялған шашқа арналған шаш кондиционерлері
ko: 염색 모발용 헤어 컨디셔너
ky: Боёлгон чачтар үчүн чач кондиционерлери
lt: Kondicionieriai dažytiems plaukams
lv: Matu kondicionieri krāsotiem matiem
mk: Регенератори за фарбана коса
ms: Perapi rambut untuk rambut berwarna
mt: Kondizzjonaturi tax-xagħar għal xagħar ikkulurit
nl: Conditioners voor geverfd haar
no: Balsam for farget hår
pl: Odżywki do włosów farbowanych
pt: Condicionadores para cabelos tingidos
ro: Balsam de păr pentru păr vopsit
ru: Кондиционеры для окрашенных волос
sk: Kondicionéry pre farbené vlasy
sl: Balzami za barvane lase
sq: Balsam për flokë të lyer
sr: Регенератори за фарбану косу
sv: Hårbalsam för färgat hår
sw: Vipodozi vya nywele kwa nywele zilizopakwa rangi
tg: Кондитсионерҳо барои мӯйҳои рангшуда
th: ครีมนวดผมสำหรับผมทำสี
tk: Reňklenen saçlar üçin saç kremleri
tr: Boyalı saçlar için saç kremleri
uk: Кондиціонери для фарбованого волосся
uz: Bo'yalgan sochlar uchun soch kremlari
vi: Dầu xả cho tóc nhuộm
zh: 染发护发素

en: Hair conditioners for greasy hair
ar: بلسم للشعر الدهني
az: Yağlı saçlar üçün saç kremləri
bg: Балсами за мазна коса
cs: Kondicionéry pro mastné vlasy
da: Balsam til fedtet hår
de: Haarspülungen für fettiges Haar
el: Μαλακτικά μαλλιών για λιπαρά μαλλιά
es: Acondicionadores para cabello graso
et: Rasvaste juuste palsamid
fa: نرم کننده مو برای موهای چرب
fi: Hoitoaineet rasvoittuville hiuksille
fr: Après-shampoings pour cheveux gras
ga: Oiriúntóirí gruaige do ghruaig olacha
hr: Regeneratori za masnu kosu
hu: Hajbalzsam zsíros hajra
hy: Մազերի կոնդիցիոներներ յուղոտ մազերի համար
id: Kondisioner rambut untuk rambut berminyak
is: Hárnæring fyrir feitt hár
it: Balsami per capelli grassi
ja: オイリーヘア用ヘアコンディショナー
ka: კონდიციონერები ცხიმიანი თმისთვის
kk: Майлы шашқа арналған шаш кондиционерлері
ko: 지성 모발용 헤어 컨디셔너
ky: Майлуу чачтар үчүн чач кондиционерлери
lt: Kondicionieriai riebiems plaukams
lv: Matu kondicionieri taukainiem matiem
mk: Регенератори за мрсна коса
ms: Perapi rambut untuk rambut berminyak
mt: Kondizzjonaturi tax-xagħar għal xagħar żejtni
nl: Conditioners voor vet haar
no: Balsam for fett hår
pl: Odżywki do włosów przetłuszczających się
pt: Condicionadores para cabelos oleosos
ro: Balsam de păr pentru păr gras
ru: Кондиционеры для жирных волос
sk: Kondicionéry pre mastné vlasy
sl: Balzami za mastne lase
sq: Balsam për flokë të yndyrshëm
sr: Регенератори за масну косу
sv: Hårbalsam för fett hår
sw: Vipodozi vya nywele kwa nywele zenye mafuta
tg: Кондитсионерҳо барои мӯйҳои равғанӣ
th: ครีมนวดผมสำหรับผมมัน
tk: Ýagly saçlar üçin saç kremleri
tr: Yağlı saçlar için saç kremleri
uk: Кондиціонери для жирного волосся
uz: Yog'li sochlar uchun soch kremlari
vi: Dầu xả cho tóc dầu
zh: 油性发质护发素

en: Hair conditioners for regular hair
ar: بلسم للشعر العادي
az: Normal saçlar üçün saç kremləri
bg: Балсами за нормална коса
cs: Kondicionéry pro normální vlasy
da: Balsam til normalt hår
de: Haarspülungen für normales Haar
el: Μαλακτικά μαλλιών για κανονικά μαλλιά
es: Acondicionadores para cabello normal
et: Tavaliste juuste palsamid
fa: نرم کننده مو برای موهای معمولی
fi: Hoitoaineet normaaleille hiuksille
fr: Après-shampoings pour cheveux normaux
ga: Oiriúntóirí gruaige do ghnáthghruaig
hr: Regeneratori za normalnu kosu
hu: Hajbalzsam normál hajra
hy: Մազերի կոնդիցիոներներ նորմալ մազերի համար
id: Kondisioner rambut untuk rambut normal
is: Hárnæring fyrir venjulegt hár
it: Balsami per capelli normali
ja: 普通の髪用ヘアコンディショナー
ka: კონდიციონერები ნორმალური თმისთვის
kk: Қалыпты шашқа арналған шаш кондиционерлері
ko: 일반 모발용 헤어 컨디셔너
ky: Нормалдуу чачтар үчүн чач кондиционерлери
lt: Kondicionieriai normaliems plaukams
lv: Matu kondicionieri normāliem matiem
mk: Регенератори за нормална коса
ms: Perapi rambut untuk rambut biasa
mt: Kondizzjonaturi tax-xagħar għal xagħar normali
nl: Conditioners voor normaal haar
no: Balsam for normalt hår
pl: Odżywki do włosów normalnych
pt: Condicionadores para cabelos normais
ro: Balsam de păr pentru păr normal
ru: Кондиционеры для нормальных волос
sk: Kondicionéry pre normálne vlasy
sl: Balzami za normalne lase
sq: Balsam për flokë normalë
sr: Регенератори за нормалну косу
sv: Hårbalsam för normalt hår
sw: Vipodozi vya nywele kwa nywele za kawaida
tg: Кондитсионерҳо барои мӯйҳои муқаррарӣ
th: ครีมนวดผมสำหรับผมธรรมดา
tk: Adaty saçlar üçin saç kremleri
tr: Normal saçlar için saç kremleri
uk: Кондиціонери для нормального волосся
uz: Normal sochlar uchun soch kremlari
vi: Dầu xả cho tóc thường
zh: 中性发质护发素

en: Hair conditioners for dry hair
ar: بلسم للشعر الجاف
az: Quru saçlar üçün saç kremləri
bg: Балсами за суха коса
cs: Kondicionéry pro suché vlasy
da: Balsam til tørt hår
de: Haarspülungen für trockenes Haar
el: Μαλακτικά μαλλιών για ξηρά μαλλιά
es: Acondicionadores para cabello seco
et: Kuivade juuste palsamid
fa: نرم کننده مو برای موهای خشک
fi: Hoitoaineet kuiville hiuksille
fr: Après-shampoings pour cheveux secs
ga: Oiriúntóirí gruaige do ghruaig thirim
hr: Regeneratori za suhu kosu
hu: Hajbalzsam száraz hajra
hy: Մազերի կոնդիցիոներներ չոր մազերի համար
id: Kondisioner rambut untuk rambut kering
is: Hárnæring fyrir þurrt hár
it: Balsami per capelli secchi
ja: ドライヘア用ヘアコンディショナー
ka: კონდიციონერები მშრალი თმისთვის
kk: Құрғақ шашқа арналған шаш кондиционерлері
ko: 건성 모발용 헤어 컨디셔너
ky: Кургак чачтар үчүн чач кондиционерлери
lt: Kondicionieriai sausiems plaukams
lv: Matu kondicionieri sausiem matiem
mk: Регенератори за сува коса
ms: Perapi rambut untuk rambut kering
mt: Kondizzjonaturi tax-xagħar għal xagħar niexef
nl: Conditioners voor droog haar
no: Balsam for tørt hår
pl: Odżywki do włosów suchych
pt: Condicionadores para cabelos secos
ro: Balsam de păr pentru păr uscat
ru: Кондиционеры для сухих волос
sk: Kondicionéry pre suché vlasy
sl: Balzami za suhe lase
sq: Balsam për flokë të thatë
sr: Регенератори за суву косу
sv: Hårbalsam för torrt hår
sw: Vipodozi vya nywele kwa nywele kavu
tg: Кондитсионерҳо барои мӯйҳои хушк
th: ครีมนวดผมสำหรับผมแห้ง
tk: Gury saçlar üçin saç kremleri
tr: Kuru saçlar için saç kremleri
uk: Кондиціонери для сухого волосся
uz: Quruq sochlar uchun soch kremlari
vi: Dầu xả cho tóc khô
zh: 干性发质护发素

en: Hair conditioners for damaged hair
ar: بلسم للشعر التالف
az: Zədələnmiş saçlar üçün saç kremləri
bg: Балсами за увредена коса
cs: Kondicionéry pro poškozené vlasy
da: Balsam til skadet hår
de: Haarspülungen für strapaziertes Haar
el: Μαλακτικά μαλλιών για ταλαιπωρημένα μαλλιά
es: Acondicionadores para cabello dañado
et: Kahjustatud juuste palsamid
fa: نرم کننده مو برای موهای آسیب دیده
fi: Hoitoaineet vaurioituneille hiuksille
fr: Après-shampoings pour cheveux abimés
ga: Oiriúntóirí gruaige do ghruaig millte
hr: Regeneratori za oštećenu kosu
hu: Hajbalzsam sérült hajra
hy: Մազերի կոնդիցիոներներ վնասված մազերի համար
id: Kondisioner rambut untuk rambut rusak
is: Hárnæring fyrir skemmt hár
it: Balsami per capelli danneggiati
ja: ダメージヘア用ヘアコンディショナー
ka: კონდიციონერები დაზიანებული თმისთვის
kk: Зақымдалған шашқа арналған шаш кондиционерлері
ko: 손상된 모발용 헤어 컨디셔너
ky: Бузулган чачтар үчүн чач кондиционерлери
lt: Kondicionieriai pažeistiems plaukams
lv: Matu kondicionieri bojātiem matiem
mk: Регенератори за оштетена коса
ms: Perapi rambut untuk rambut rosak
mt: Kondizzjonaturi tax-xagħar għal xagħar bil-ħsara
nl: Conditioners voor beschadigd haar
no: Balsam for skadet hår
pl: Odżywki do włosów zniszczonych
pt: Condicionadores para cabelos danificados
ro: Balsam de păr pentru păr deteriorat
ru: Кондиционеры для поврежденных волос
sk: Kondicionéry pre poškodené vlasy
sl: Balzami za poškodovane lase
sq: Balsam për flokë të dëmtuar
sr: Регенератори за оштећену косу
sv: Hårbalsam för skadat hår
sw: Vipodozi vya nywele kwa nywele zilizoharibika
tg: Кондитсионерҳо барои мӯйҳои осебдида
th: ครีมนวดผมสำหรับผมเสีย
tk: Zeperlenen saçlar üçin saç kremleri
tr: Yıpranmış saçlar için saç kremleri
uk: Кондиціонери для пошкодженого волосся
uz: Shikastlangan sochlar uchun soch kremlari
vi: Dầu xả cho tóc hư tổn
zh: 损伤发质护发素

en: Hair conditioners for children
ar: بلسم للأطفال
az: Uşaqlar üçün saç kremləri
bg: Балсами за деца
cs: Kondicionéry pro děti
da: Balsam til børn
de: Haarspülungen für Kinder
el: Μαλακτικά μαλλιών για παιδιά
es: Acondicionadores para niños
et: Laste juuksepalsamid
fa: نرم کننده مو برای کودکان
fi: Hoitoaineet lapsille
fr: Après-shampoings pour enfant
ga: Oiriúntóirí gruaige do pháistí
hr: Regeneratori za djecu
hu: Hajbalzsamok gyerekeknek
hy: Մազի կոնդիցիոներներ երեխաների համար
id: Kondisioner rambut untuk anak-anak
is: Hárnæring fyrir börn
it: Balsami per capelli per bambini
ja: 子供用ヘアコンディショナー
ka: თმის კონდიციონერები ბავშვებისთვის
kk: Балаларға арналған шаш кондиционерлері
ko: 어린이용 헤어 컨디셔너
ky: Балдар үчүн чач кондиционерлери
lt: Plaukų kondicionieriai vaikams
lv: Matu kondicionieri bērniem
mk: Регенератори за деца
ms: Perapi rambut untuk kanak-kanak
mt: Kondizzjonaturi tax-xagħar għat-tfal
nl: Conditioners voor kinderen
no: Balsam for barn
pl: Odżywki do włosów dla dzieci
pt: Condicionadores de cabelo para crianças
ro: Balsam de păr pentru copii
ru: Кондиционеры для волос для детей
sk: Kondicionéry pre deti
sl: Balzami za lase za otroke
sq: Balsam për flokë për fëmijë
sr: Регенератори за децу
sv: Hårbalsam för barn
sw: Vipodozi vya nywele kwa watoto
tg: Кондитсионерҳо барои кӯдакон
th: ครีมนวดผมสำหรับเด็ก
tk: Çagalar üçin saç kremleri
tr: Çocuklar için saç kremleri
uk: Кондиціонери для волосся для дітей
uz: Bolalar uchun soch kremlari
vi: Dầu xả cho trẻ em
zh: 儿童护发素

en: Shampoos
ar: شامبو
az: Şampunlar
bg: Шампоани
cs: Šampony
da: Shampoo
de: Haarwaschmittel
el: Σαμπουάν
es: Champús
et: Šampoonid
fa: شامپو
fi: Shampoot
fr: Shampoings, Shampooings
ga: Seampúnna
hr: Šamponi
hu: Samponok
hy: Շամպուններ
id: Sampo
is: Sjampó
it: Shampoo
ja: シャンプー
ka: შამპუნები
kk: Шампуньдер
ko: 샴푸
ky: Шампунь
lt: Šampūnai
lv: Šampūni
mk: Шампони
ms: Syampu
mt: Xampù
nl: Shampoos
no: Sjampo
pl: Szampony
pt: Champôs
ro: Șampoane
ru: Шампуни
sk: Šampóny
sl: Šamponi
sq: Shampo
sr: Шампони
sv: Schampo
sw: Shampoo
tg: Шампунҳо
th: แชมพู
tk: Şampunlar
tr: Şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні
uz: Shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội
zh: 洗发水

en: 2-in-1 Shampoos, Shampoos 2-in-1
ar: شامبو 2 في 1
az: 2-si-1-də şampunlar
bg: Шампоани 2 в 1
cs: Šampony 2 v 1
da: 2-i-1 shampoo
de: 2-in-1 Shampoos
el: Σαμπουάν 2 σε 1
es: Champús 2 en 1
et: 2-in-1 šampoonid
fa: شامپو 2 در 1
fi: 2-in-1 Shampoot
fr: Shampoings 2-en-1
ga: Seampúnna 2-in-1
hr: Šamponi 2-u-1
hu: 2 az 1-ben samponok
hy: 2-ը 1-ում շամպուններ
id: Sampo 2-in-1
is: 2-í-1 sjampó
it: Shampoo 2 in 1
ja: 2-in-1 シャンプー
ka: 2-ში 1 შამპუნები
kk: 2-і 1-де шампуньдер
ko: 2-in-1 샴푸
ky: 2-в-1 шампунь
lt: 2-in-1 šampūnai
lv: 2-in-1 šampūni
mk: Шампони 2 во 1
ms: Syampu 2 dalam 1
mt: Xampù 2-in-1
nl: 2-in-1 Shampoos
no: 2-i-1 sjampo
pl: Szampony 2 w 1
pt: Champôs 2 em 1
ro: Șampoane 2 în 1
ru: Шампуни 2 в 1
sk: Šampóny 2 v 1
sl: Šamponi 2 v 1
sq: Shampo 2 në 1
sr: Шампони 2 у 1
sv: 2-i-1 schampo
sw: Shampoo 2 kwa 1
tg: Шампунҳои 2 дар 1
th: แชมพู 2 อิน 1
tk: 2-si-1-de şampunlar
tr: 2'si 1 arada şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні 2 в 1
uz: 2-si-1 da shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội 2 trong 1
zh: 二合一洗发水

en: Shampoos + Conditioners
ar: شامبو + بلسم
az: Şampunlar + Kondisionerler
bg: Шампоани + Балсами
bn: শ্যাম্পু + কন্ডিশনার
ca: Xampús + Condicionadors
cs: Šampony + Kondicionéry
da: Shampoo + Balsam
de: Shampoos + Conditioner
el: Σαμπουάν + μαλακτικό
es: Champús + Acondicionadores
et: Šampoonid + Palsamid
fa: شامپو + نرم کننده
fi: Shampoot + Hoitoaineet
fr: Shampoings + Après-shampoings
ga: Seampúnna + Oiriúntóirí
hr: Šamponi + Regeneratori
hu: Samponok + Balzsamok
hy: Շամպուններ + Կոնդիցիոներներ
id: Sampo + Kondisioner
is: Sjampó + Hárnæring
it: Shampoo + Balsamo
ja: シャンプー+コンディショナー
ka: შამპუნები + კონდიციონერები
kk: Шампуньдер + Кондиционерлер
km: សាប៊ូកក់សក់ + ក្រែមបន្ទន់សក់
ko: 샴푸 + 린스
ky: Шампунь + Кондиционер
lt: Šampūnai + Kondicionieriai
lv: Šampūni + Kondicionieri
mk: Шампони + Регенератори
ms: Syampu + Perapi
mt: Xampù + Kondizzjonaturi
nl: Shampoos + Conditioners
no: Sjampo + Balsam
pl: Szampony + Odżywki
pt: Champôs + Condicionadores
ro: Șampoane + Balsamuri
ru: Шампуни + Кондиционеры
sk: Šampóny + Kondicionéry
sl: Šamponi + Balzami
sq: Shampo + Balsamë
sr: Шампони + Регенератори
sv: Schampo + Balsam
sw: Shampoo + Vipodozi
tg: Шампунҳо + Кондитсионерҳо
th: แชมพู + ครีมนวดผม
tk: Şampunlar + Kondisionerler
tr: Şampuanlar + Saç Kremleri
uk: Шампуні + Кондиціонери
ur: شیمپو + کنڈیشنر
uz: Shampunlar + Konditsionerlar
vi: Dầu gội + Dầu xả
zh: 洗发水+护发素

en: Shampoos + Shower gels
ar: شامبو + جل الاستحمام
az: Şampunlar + Duş gelləri
bg: Шампоани + Душ гелове
bn: শ্যাম্পু + শাওয়ার জেল
ca: Xampús + Gels de dutxa
cs: Šampony + Sprchové gely
da: Shampoo + Shower gels
de: Shampoos + Duschgels
el: Σαμπουάν + Αφρόλουτρα
es: Champús + Geles de ducha
et: Šampoonid + Dušigeelid
fa: شامپو + ژل دوش
fi: Shampoot + Suihkugeelit
fr: Shampoings + Gels douche, Shampoings douche
ga: Seampúnna + Gels cithfholcadáin
he: שמפו + ג'ל רחצה
hr: Šamponi + Gelovi za tuširanje
hu: Samponok + Tusfürdők
hy: Շամպուններ + Ցնցուղի գելեր
id: Sampo + Gel Mandi
is: Sjampó + sturtugel
it: Shampoo + Gel doccia
ja: シャンプー+シャワージェル
ka: შამპუნები + შხაპის გელები
kk: Шампуньдер + Душқа арналған гельдер
km: សាប៊ូកក់សក់ + ជែលដុសខ្លួន
ko: 샴푸 + 샤워 젤
ky: Шампунь + Душ гелдери
lt: Šampūnai + Dušo želė
lv: Šampūni + Dušas želejas
mk: Шампони + Гелови за туширање
ms: Syampu + Gel Mandi
mt: Xampù + Ġellijiet tad-doċċa
nl: Shampoos + Douchegels
no: Sjampo + Dusjsåper
pl: Szampony + Żele pod prysznic
pt: Champôs + Géis de duche
ro: Șampoane + Geluri de duș
ru: Шампуни + Гели для душа
sk: Šampóny + Sprchovacie gély
sl: Šamponi + Geli za prhanje
sq: Shampo + Xhel Dushi
sr: Шампони + Гелови за туширање
sv: Schampo + Duschgel
sw: Shampoo + Geli za kuoga
tg: Шампунҳо + Гелҳои душ
th: แชมพู + เจลอาบน้ำ
tk: Şampunlar + Duş gelleri
tr: Şampuanlar + Duş jelleri
uk: Шампуні + Гелі для душу
ur: شیمپو + شاور جیل
uz: Shampunlar + Dush gellari
vi: Dầu gội + Sữa tắm
zh: 洗发水+沐浴露